fi: Lanka-/nyörityyppi (helmikuvio): Helmivaijeri; C-Lon-helmilanka; Joustolanka; FireLine (punottu siima); KO-lanka; Nahkanauha; Monofilamentti; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon- / Super-Lon -lanka; Silamide; Vahattu polyesterilanka; WildFire; Muu
ja: スレッド/コードタイプ (ビーズパターン): ビーディングワイヤー; C-Lon ビーディングスレッド; エラスティックコード; FireLine (編組釣り糸); KO スレッド; レザーコード; モノフィラメント; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon / Super-Lon コード; Silamide; ワックスポリエステルコード; WildFire; その他
pl: Typ nici/sznurka (wzór koralikowy): Drut do koralików; Nić do koralików C-Lon; Elastyczny sznurek; FireLine (plecionka wędkarska); Nić KO; Rzemień skórzany; Żyłka; Nymo; One-G; Sznurek S-Lon/Super-Lon; Silamide; Woskowany sznurek poliestrowy; WildFire; Inne
lt-LT: Siūlo / virvelės tipas (karoliukų vėrimo schema): Vėrimo vielutė; „C-Lon“ vėrimo siūlas; Elastinė virvelė; „FireLine“ (pintas žvejybos valas); „KO“ siūlas; Odinė virvelė; Vienagijis valas; „Nymo“; „One-G“; „S-Lon“ / „Super-Lon“ virvelė; „Silamide“; Vaškuota poliesterio virvelė; „WildFire“; Kita
zh-TW: 線/繩類型(串珠圖案): 串珠線; C-Lon 串珠線; 彈性繩; FireLine (編織釣魚線); KO 線; 皮繩; 單絲線; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon / Super-Lon 繩; Silamide; 上蠟聚酯纖維繩; WildFire; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta sukanca/vrvice (za vzorec nizanja kroglic): Žica za nizanje perlic; Nit za nizanje perlic C-Lon; Elastična vrvica; FireLine (pletena ribiška vrvica); Nit KO; Usnjena vrvica; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; Vrvica S-Lon / Super-Lon; Silamide; Voskana poliestrska vrvica; WildFire; Drugo
es: Tipo de hilo/cordón (patrón de abalorios): Alambre para abalorios; Hilo para abalorios C-Lon; Cordón elástico; FireLine (hilo de pescar trenzado); Hilo KO; Cordón de cuero; Monofilamento; Nymo; One-G; Cordón S-Lon/Super-Lon; Silamide; Cordón de poliéster encerado; WildFire; Otro
de: Garn-/Kordelart (Perlenmuster): Perlendraht; C-Lon-Faden; Elastische Kordel; FireLine (geflochtene Angelschnur); KO-Faden; Lederkordel; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon-/Super-Lon-Kordel; Silamid; Gewachste Polyesterkordel; WildFire; Sonstige
el: νήμα/τύπος κορδονιού (μοτίβο με χάντρες): Σύρμα για χάντρες; Νήμα για χάντρες C-Lon; Ελαστικό κορδόνι; FireLine (πλεκτό νήμα ψαρέματος); Νήμα KO; Δερμάτινο κορδόνι; Μονόινο; Nymo; One-G; Κορδόνι S-Lon / Super-Lon; Silamide; Κερωμένο κορδόνι πολυεστέρα; WildFire; Άλλο
zh-CN: 串珠用线/绳类型: 串珠线; C-Lon 串珠线; 弹力绳; FireLine（编织钓鱼线）; KO 线; 皮绳; 单丝; Nymo 线; One-G 线; S-Lon / Super-Lon 绳; Silamide 线; 涂蜡涤纶绳; WildFire 线; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de fio/cabo (padrão de missangas): Fio de missangas; Fio de missangas C-Lon; Cordão elástico; FireLine (linha de pesca entrançada); Fio KO; Cordão de couro; Monofilamento; Nymo; One-G; Cordão S-Lon/Super-Lon; Silamida; Cordão de poliéster encerado; WildFire; Outro
pt-BR: Linha/cordão tipo (padrão de miçangas): Fio para miçangas; Fio para miçangas C-Lon; Fio elástico; FireLine (linha de pesca trançada); Fio KO; Cordão de couro; Monofilamento; Nymo; One-G; Fio S-Lon / Super-Lon; Silamide; Fio de poliéster encerado; WildFire; Outros
tr: İplik/kordon tipi (boncuk deseni): Boncuk teli; C-Lon boncuk ipi; Elastik kordon; FireLine (örgülü misina); KO ipi; Deri kordon; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon / Super-Lon kordon; Silamide; Mumlu polyester kordon; WildFire; Diğer
cs: Typ vlákna/šňůrky (korálkování): Drátek na korálkování; Korálkovací nit C-Lon; Pružná šňůrka; FireLine (pletený vlasec); Nit KO; Kožená šňůrka; Monofil; Nymo; One-G; Šňůrka S-Lon / Super-Lon; Silamide; Voskovaná polyesterová šňůrka; WildFire; Ostatní
fr: Type de fil ou de cordon (modèle de perlage): Fil pour perles; Fil pour perles C-Lon; Cordon élastique; FireLine (fil de pêche tressé); Fil KO; Cordon en cuir; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; Cordon S-Lon / Super-Lon; Silamide; Cordon en polyester ciré; WildFire; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta konca/uzice (uzorak perlica): Žica za perle; Konac za perle C-Lon; Elastična vrpca; FireLine (pletena ribička struna); Konac KO; Kožna vrpca; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; Vrpca S-Lon / Super-Lon; Silamid; Navoštena poliesterska vrpca; WildFire; Ostalo
en: Thread/cord type (beading pattern): Beading wire; C-Lon beading thread; Elastic cord; FireLine (braided fishing line); KO thread; Leather cord; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon / Super-Lon cord; Silamide; Waxed polyester cord; WildFire; Other
sv: Tråd-/snörestyp (pärlningsmönster): Pärltråd; C-Lon pärltråd; Elastisk tråd; FireLine (flätad fiskelina); KO-tråd; Lädertråd; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon/Super-Lon-tråd; Silamide; Vaxad polyestertråd; WildFire; Annat
da: Tråd- eller snortype (perlemønster): Perletråd; C-Lon-perletråd; Elastiksnor; FireLine (flettet fiskeline); KO-tråd; Lædersnor; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon- / Super-Lon-snor; Silamide; Vokset polyestersnor; WildFire; Andet
nl: Draad/koord type (kralenpatroon): Rijgdraad; C-Lon-rijgdraad; Elastisch koord; FireLine (gevlochten vislijn); KO-draad; Leren koord; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon- / Super-Lon-koord; Silamide; Gewaxt polyesterkoord; WildFire; Overige
th: ใช้สำหรับ/ชนิดสายไฟ (ลายประดับด้วยลูกปัด): ลวดร้อยลูกปัด; ด้ายร้อยลูกปัด C-Lon; เอ็นยืด; FireLine (สายเบ็ดถัก); ด้าย KO; เชือกหนัง; เอ็นใสเดี่ยว; นีโม (Nymo); วัน-จี (One-G); เชือก S-Lon / Super-Lon; ไซลาไมด์ (Silamide); เชือกโพลีเอสเตอร์เคลือบแว็กซ์; ไวลด์ไฟร์ (WildFire); อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de ață/șnur (model pentru mărgele): Sârmă pentru mărgele; Fir pentru mărgele C-Lon; Șnur elastic; FireLine (fir de pescuit împletit); Fir KO; Șnur de piele; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; Șnur S-Lon / Super-Lon; Silamide; Șnur din poliester cerat; WildFire; Altele
vi: Loại chỉ/dây (mẫu xâu hạt): Dây xỏ hạt; Chỉ xỏ hạt C-Lon; Dây thun; FireLine (dây câu tết); Chỉ KO; Dây da; Sợi cước; Nymo; One-G; Dây S-Lon / Super-Lon; Silamide; Dây polyester phủ sáp; WildFire; Khác
ru: Тип нити или шнура (схема бисероплетения): Ювелирный тросик (ланка); Нить для бисера C-Lon; Эластичный шнур; FireLine (плетеная леска); Нить KO; Кожаный шнур; Мононить; Nymo; One-G; Шнур S-Lon / Super-Lon; Силамид; Вощеный полиэстеровый шнур; WildFire; Другое
it: Tipo di filo/cordoncino (schema di perline): Filo per perline; Filo per perline C-Lon; Cordoncino elastico; FireLine (filo da pesca intrecciato); Filo KO; Cordino in pelle; Monofilamento; Nymo; One-G; Cordoncino S-Lon / Super-Lon; Silamide; Cordino in poliestere cerato; WildFire; Altro
sk-SK: Typ vlákna/šnúrky (vzorka navliekania korálikov): Navliekacie lanko; Navliekacia niť C-Lon; Elastická šnúrka; FireLine (pletená rybárska šnúra); Niť KO; Kožená šnúrka; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; Šnúrka S-Lon/Super-Lon; Silamide; Voskovaná polyesterová šnúrka; WildFire; Iné
hu: Cérna/zsinór típusa (gyöngyös minta): Gyöngyfűző drót; C-Lon gyöngyfűző cérna; Rugalmas zsinór; FireLine (fonott damil); KO cérna; Bőrzsinór; Monofil; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon / Super-Lon zsinór; Silamide; Viaszolt poliészter zsinór; WildFire; Egyéb
nb: Tråd-/snortype (perlemønster): Perlevaier; C-Lon-perletråd; Elastisk snor; FireLine (flettet fiskesnøre); KO-tråd; Skinnsnor; Monofilament; Nymo; One-G; S-Lon- / Super-Lon-snor; Silamid; Vokset polyestersnor; WildFire; Annet
ko: 실/끈 유형(비즈 패턴): 비즈 와이어; C-Lon 비즈 실; 탄성 끈; FireLine(합사 낚싯줄); KO 실; 가죽 끈; 모노필라멘트; 니모(Nymo); One-G; S-Lon/Super-Lon 끈; 실라미드; 왁스 코팅 폴리에스터 끈; WildFire; 기타
bg-BG: Тип конец/шнур (модел за нанизване): Тел за мъниста; Конец за мъниста C-Lon; Еластичен шнур; FireLine (плетено влакно за риболов); Конец KO; Кожен шнур; Монофиламент; Nymo; One-G; Шнур S-Lon/Super-Lon; Silamide; Восъчен полиестерен шнур; WildFire; Друго